North Dakota, session 69, SB2213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Teaching license - Mathematics instruction competency.
1. The board shall ensure a candidate for teacher licensure, who will be certified to be a
secondary mathematics teacher, demonstrates competencies in direct and explicit
mathematics instruction and pedagogy.
2. A candidate satisfies the requirements of this section if the candidate demonstrates:
a. The candidate has received training in mathematics instruction competencies from an
accredited or approved program; or
b. Mastery of the topics under subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 3 of this Act .
3. The board may issue a provisional license for up to two years to a teacher licensure candidate
who does not meet the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. The new section to chapter 15.1-13 of the North Dakota Century Code,
as created by section 1 of this Act, is amended and reenacted as follows:
Teaching license - Mathematics instruction competency.
1. The board shall ensure a candidate for teacher licensure, who will be certified to be aan
elementary education or secondary mathematics teacher, or both, demonstrates
competencies in direct and explicit mathematics instruction and pedagogy.
2. A candidate satisfies the requirements of this section if the candidate demonstrates:
a. The candidate has received training in mathematics instruction competencies from an
accredited or approved program; or
b. Mastery of the topics under subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 3 of this Act.
3. The board may issue a provisional license for up to two years to a teacher licensure candidate
who does not meet the requirements of this section.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2213 - PAGE 2
Mathematics curriculum - Professional development and intervention.
1. Each school district and nonpublic school shall:
a. Ensure the portion of its curriculum which is related to mathematics is based on evidence
and research, includes differentiated instruction, is aligned to the state standards, and
focuses on:
(1) Foundational skills, including:
(a) Numbers and operations;
(b) Algebraic reasoning;
(c) Geometry and measurement; and
(d) Data, probability, and statistics; and
(2) Competencies, including:
(a) Problem solving;
(b) Connections; and
(c) Reasoning and proof.
b. Provide continuing professional development for teachers of mathematics, including
special education teachers, and school leaders which:
(1) Focuses on best practices in mathematics instruction, including:
(a) Explicit and differentiated instruction;
(b) Data-driven decisionmaking; and
(c) The topics under subdivision a .
(2) Includes evidence-based programming on the science of mathematics which aligns
with the topics under subdivision a .
c. Implement formative assessments at regular intervals, adjust teaching practices
accordingly, and provide targeted interventions for each student who needs additional
support.
d. Implement a research-based intervention program suggested by the state and adopted
by the school board, which uses high-quality supplemental materials that incorporate
evidence-based instructional strategies adopted by the school board.
2. To be approved by the superintendent of public instruction, certify each school or nonpublic
school shall:
a. Ensure the placement of qualified teachers in grades four through eight;
b. Have integrated mathematics instruments used to identify deficiencies in the skills under
subdivision a of subsection 1; and
c. Have integrated evidence-based instruction and assessment resources to support
mathematics development and mastery.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. The new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code,
as created by section 3 of this Act, is amended and reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2213 - PAGE 3
Mathematics curriculum - Professional development and intervention.
1. Each school district and nonpublic school shall:
a. Ensure the portion of its curriculum which is related to mathematics is based on evidence
and research, includes differentiated instruction, is aligned to the state standards, and
focuses on:
(1) Foundational skills, including:
(a) Numbers and operations;
(b) Algebraic reasoning;
(c) Geometry and measurement; and
(d) Data, probability, and statistics; and
(2) Competencies, including:
(a) Problem solving;
(b) Connections; and
(c) Reasoning and proof.
b. Provide continuing professional development for teachers of mathematics, including
special education teachers, and school leaders which:
(1) Focuses on best practices in mathematics instruction, including:
(a) Explicit and differentiated instruction;
(b) Data-driven decisionmaking; and
(c) The topics under subdivision a.
(2) Includes evidence-based programming on the science of mathematics which aligns
with the topics under subdivision a.
c. Implement formative assessments at regular intervals, adjust teaching practices
accordingly, and provide targeted interventions for each student who needs additional
support.
d. Implement a research-based intervention program suggested by the state and adopted
by the school board, which uses high-quality supplemental materials that incorporate
evidence-based instructional strategies adopted by the school board.
e. For a student in kindergarten through grade three:
(1) Use a screening process for early identification of mathematics deficiencies and
characteristics of dyscalculia;
(2) Inform the student's parent or legal guardian about the screening process, the
student's results, and the importance of early intervention;
(3) Provide resources and guidance to the student's parent or legal guardian to support
mathematics learning at home; and
(4) If the student is identified as having characteristics of mathematics deficiencies or
dyscalculia, develop an education plan with accommodations.

S. B. NO. 2213 - PAGE 4
2. A school district or special education unit shall provide a screening process under paragraph 1
of subdivision e of subsection 1 for a student upon request by a parent, legal guardian, or
teacher.
2.3. To be approved by the superintendent of public instruction, certify each school or nonpublic
school shall:
a. Ensure the placement of qualified teachers in grades four through eight;
b. Have integrated mathematics instruments used to identify deficiencies in the skills under
subdivision a of subsection 1; and
c. Have integrated evidence-based instruction and assessment resources to support
mathematics development and mastery.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Mathematics curriculum and professional development - Rules - Reports to the
superintendent of public instruction and the legislative management.
1. The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the kindergarten through grade
twelve education coordination council, shall adopt rules to implement section 3 of this Act ,
including rules to monitor implementation.
2. The superintendent of public instruction and the regional education associations shall support
school districts with implementation of section 3 of this Act. The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide periodic reports to the legislative management on the implementation
and effectiveness of section 3 of this Act in improving educational outcomes and studen t
competency in mathematics and shall publish the reports submitted by school districts on the
website of the department of public instruction.
SECTION 6. PILOT PROGRAM - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - MATHEMATICS
SCREENING TOOL - REPORT. Beginning with the 2025-26 school year and continuing through the
2026-27 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and operate a pilot program
to provide screening services for students in grades four through eight. The pilot program must include
individualized mathematics learning tools that use a skill-level screener and skill-level assessments to
identify student needs, measure progress across multiple grades, and report on that progress to
evaluate and improve student learning and performance outcomes. The individualized learning tools
must be aligned with the 2023 North Dakota mathematics content standards, skills progressions, and
competencies. Up to $300,000 of the appropriation under section 7 of this Act must be allocated for the
pilot program, including professional development for mathematics teachers on the screening tool. The
superintendent shall compile data on the implementation of the pilot program, including student
mathematics outcomes and the impact of each screening service and instrument used. The
superintendent shall report the initial findings to the seventieth legislative assembly. The superintendent
shall report the final findings to the seventy-first legislative assembly.
SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - MATHEMATICS
CURRICULUM AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. There is appropriated out of any moneys in
the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,500,000, or so much of
the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of providing
support to schools and regional education associations to improve kindergarten through grade eight
mathematics curriculum, instruction, and student achievement, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. Funds must be directed toward district-level professional development,
including training, instructional rounds, coaching, and workshops designed to improve mathematics
instruction and student achievement. Funds must be directed to support partnerships with regional
educational associations for the delivery of district-level training and coordination of this mathematics
improvement initiative. Up to $200,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for state-

S. B. NO. 2213 - PAGE 5
level staffing or department of public instruction administrative expenses. Up to $300,000 of the
appropriation in this section must be allocated for the pilot program established under section 6 of this
Act.
SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 2 and 4 of this Act become effective on July 1, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2213 - PAGE 6
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2213.
Senate Vote: Yeas 31 Nays 16 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 63 Nays 30 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State